Florida, session 2026, HB71.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 192.1231, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
192.1231 Homestead Property Tax Relief Program.—
(1) The Homestead Property Tax Relief Program is created
within the Department of Financial Services. The Department of
Financial Services shall provide funding and oversight for the
program consistent with this section. The purpose of the program
is to distribute funds annually to eligible homestead property
owners.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb71-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 71 2026
(2) As used in this section, the term "eligible
homesteader" means the person who receives a homestead exemption
pursuant to s. 196.031 on homestead property owned on or before
September 30, 2024, with a current taxable value of at least
$100,000 but no more than $450,000.
(3) Each September 30, beginning in 2026 and ending in
2030, the Chief Financial Officer shall issue a warrant in the
amount of $1,000 to each eligible homesteader.
(4) The Chief Financial Officer shall work with county
property appraisers to identify all eligible homesteaders.
(5) The Department of Financial Services shall develop
rules to administer the Homestead Property Tax Relief Program.
(6) This section is repealed January 1, 2031.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb71-00